North Carolina, session 2025, HB1025.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 3.3.6 of the Charter of the Town of Conetoe, being Chapter
154 of the Private Laws of 1887, as amended, and as evidenced by the Code of Ordinances of
the Town of Conetoe adopted March 11, 2025, reads as rewritten:
"3.3.6 Mayor Not to Vote: Mayor's Voting Authority: The Mayor shall not may vote on any
question before the Board except in the case of a tie deadlocking decision of the Board of
Commissioners.Board."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1025-v-2*